Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-905
Secondary boycott; injury to business, property, or person; damages.

Any person injured in his business, property or person by reason of any unlawful act as defined in section 48-903, may sue therefor in the district courts of this state, and shall recover the damages sustained by him, trebled, his reasonable attorneys' fees and the cost of the litigation.

Laws 1959, c. 231, § 5, p. 809.